District of Columbia statutes.
22-1711

Repealed

Penalty for communicating, receiving, exhibiting, or displaying quotations of prices.

Repealed.

Mar. 3, 1901, ch. 854, § 869c
Mar. 1, 1909, 35 Stat. 671, ch. 233
Apr. 29, 2004, D.C. Law 15-154, § 3(i), 50 DCR 10996
1981 Ed., § 22-1511.
1973 Ed., § 22-1511.